Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,124
Home services permit; renewal; revocation or expiration; effect.

Each home services permit shall be subject to renewal at the same time as the salon license and shall be renewed upon request of the permitholder if the salon is operating its home services in compliance with the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act and if the salon license is renewed. No permit that has been revoked or expired may be reinstated or transferred to another owner or location.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 124;

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 50;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,163;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 386.